Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.060

Director of labor and industries to arbitrate disputes.

Such contract shall contain a further provision that in case any dispute arises as to what are the prevailing rates of wages for work of a similar nature and such dispute cannot be adjusted by the parties in interest, including labor and management representatives, the matter shall be referred for arbitration to the director of the department of labor and industries of the state and his or her decision therein shall be final and conclusive and binding on all parties involved in the dispute.

[ 1989 c 12 s 10; 1965 ex.s. c 133 s 4; 1945 c 63 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 10322-25.]

NOTES:

Arbitration of disputes: Chapter 49.08 RCW.

Uniform arbitration act: Chapter 7.04A RCW.